Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-133 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section:
1. "Alert" means a notification generated by an automated
license plate recognition system indicating that a vehicle passed an
automated license plate recognition system camera with a license
plate or vehicle characteristics that match data held by the
National Crime Information Center or other database or hot list;

Req. No. 10364 Page 1

2. "Automatic license plate reader system" means a system of
one or more law-enforcement-controlled cameras combined with
computer algorithms to convert images of registration plates into
computer-readable data;
3. "Highway right-of-way" means a public road being maintained
by the Oklahoma Department of Transportation.
4. "Hot list" means a list of license plates or vehicle
characteristics against which vehicles passing by automatic license
plate recognition system cameras are checked for matches;
5. "Law enforcement agency" means any county sheriff, municipal
police department, the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, and any state or
local public body that employs public safety personnel; and
6. "License plate reader data" means the global positioning
device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate number,
and vehicle characteristics captured by an automatic license plate
reader system;
B. In accordance with applicable state and federal laws
governing the use and management of highway rights-of-way and
subject to the approval of the Federal Highway Administration as
required by federal law, automatic license plate reader systems may
be utilized on highway rights-of-way to the extent that such use is
consistent with the continued use, operation, maintenance, and
safety of the highway facility and does not interfere with the free
and safe flow of traffic. Except as provided in Sections 7-606.1
Req. No. 10364 Page 2

and 7-606.2 of this title, such devices shall not be used to enforce
state or local traffic violations or issue citations for such
violations.
C. Prior to installing an automatic license plate reader system
camera on a highway right-of-way, a law enforcement agency shall
obtain a permit from the Department of Transportation. The
Department shall issue a permit to the law enforcement agency that
meets standards set by the Department.
D. In addition to Sections 7-606.1 and 7-606.2 of this title,
operation of and access to an automatic license plate reader system
by law enforcement agencies shall be for official law enforcement
purposes only.
E. Prior to the use of an automatic license plate recognition
system, a law enforcement agency shall adopt and make publicly
available a written policy governing the use of the automatic
license plate recognition system that includes, at a minimum:
1. Supervisory oversight of the automatic license plate
recognition system;
2. Training protocol for automatic license plate recognition
system users;
3. Protocol for ensuring hot lists stay up to date;
4. Rules for access to and security of license plate reader
data;

Req. No. 10364 Page 3

5. Rules for retention and destruction of license plate reader
data; and
6. An audit schedule and process to ensure that the system is
used in accordance with this section and agency policy.
F. A law enforcement agency using an automatic license plate
recognition system shall comply with the following:
1. Upon receipt of an alert and prior to performing a traffic
stop, an officer, dispatcher, or other law enforcement agency
employee shall visually confirm that the scanned plate matches the
alert with regard to plate letters, numbers, and issuing state and
confirm that the stop meets criteria laid out in the policies of the
law enforcement agency and applicable law;
2. License plate reader data shall be deleted within thirty
(30) days of being recorded in such a manner that the record is
destroyed and not recoverable, unless the record is a part of an
ongoing investigation, in which case the data shall be retained and
destroyed in accordance with applicable records retention laws;
3. License plate reader data shall be encrypted in transmission
and at rest, utilizing industry-recognized encryption protocols to
safeguard against unauthorized access. The data must be stored in a
manner that meets or exceeds the requirements set forth by
recognized standards such as IS0/IEC 27001, ensuring comprehensive
security measures including, but not limited to, physical security,
access control, and regular security assessments;
Req. No. 10364 Page 4

4. Any license plate or vehicle added to a hot list in order to
trigger an alert and any search performed of license plate reader
data shall be supported by a legitimate, specific, and documented
law enforcement purpose;
5. Access logs for the automatic license plate recognition
system shall be maintained to provide a clear audit trail for
oversight and accountability purposes;
6. A law enforcement agency authorized to use an automatic
license plate recognition system under this section shall own the
license plate reader data and shall not sell license plate reader
data for any purpose; and
7. Law enforcement agencies may share license plate reader data
with other law enforcement agencies for legitimate law enforcement
purposes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10364 JBH 03/25/26







Req. No. 10364 Page 5